esu.dummy.twol
! echo "?* ;" | hfst-regexp2fst -o univ.hfst 
! hfst-twolc -i esu.dummy.twol -o esu.dummy.twol.hfst
! hfst-compose-intersect -1 univ.hfst -2 esu.dummy.twol.hfst -o esu.dummy.hfst 
! echo "kanaqllag%:(e)t" | hfst-lookup esu.dummy.hfst

! echo "nepauna:nga" | hfst-lookup esu.dummy.hfst

Alphabet
    a c e g i k l m n p q r s t u v w y m̄ n̄
    vv ll ss gg rr ng n͞g u͡g u͡gg u͡r u͡rr
    k̲:k q̲:q g̲:g r̲:r g̲g̲:gg r̲r̲:rr                 ! for -velar postbase assimilation
    %[e%] %[e%]:e                               ! HBC/Nun: initial e is not weak
    ʼ                                           ! Keep apostrophe from lexical entries
    ạ                                           ! for (ar) droppping

    ! All operators and allomorph operators map to morpheme segmenter 
    %(a%):%> %(e%):%> %(g%):%> %(i%):%> %(l%):%> %(r%):%> %(s%):%> %(t%):%> %(u%):%> 
    %(aa%):%> %(ar%):%> %(ar%*%):%> %(ng%):%> %(ur%):%>
    %(g%/t%):%> ! %(r%/l%):%> %(u%/i%):%>

    %+:%> %–:%> %~:%> %%:%> %::%> %':%> %.:%> %*:%> %°:%> 
    %@¹:%> %@²:%> %@³:%> %@⁴:%> %@⁵:%> %@ˡ:%> %@ˁ:%> %@ʸ:%> %@:%>  
    %=; 

Sets 
    Bndry = %+ %– %~ %% %: %' %. %* %° 
        %@¹ %@² %@³ %@⁴ %@⁵ %@ˡ %@ˁ %@ʸ %@
        %(a%) %(e%) %(g%) %(r%) %(s%) %(t%) %(u%)
        %(aa%) %(ar%) %(ar%*%) %(ng%) %(ur%) %(g%/t%) %(r%/l%) %(u%/i%) ;
    AtSign = %@¹ %@² %@³ %@⁴ %@⁵ %@ˡ %@ˁ %@ʸ %@ ;

    Stop = p t c k q k̲ q̲ ;
    VoiceFric = v l s g r u͡g u͡r g̲ r̲ ; 
    VlessFric = vv ll ss gg rr u͡gg u͡rr g̲g̲ r̲r̲ ;
    VoiceNasal = m n ng ;
    VlessNasal = m̄ n̄ n͞g ;

    VoiceCon = VoiceFric VoiceNasal ;
    VlessCon = VlessFric VlessNasal Stop ;

    Fric = VoiceFric VlessFric ;
    Nasal = VoiceNasal VlessNasal ;

    Con = Stop Fric Nasal w y ;

    FVow = a i u ạ ;
    Vow = FVow e ;

Rules 

"e:0 = ~ | word# | eVowPostbase | semifinaleVowPostbase | (e):e | -- | te@ "
e:0 <=> _ [ Bndry: - %': ]* %~: ; ! "Rule for Tilde"
        Vow t:n _ [ .#. | %= ] ; ! "Word final Vte -> e:0"
        _ Bndry:+ :Vow ; ! "vowel postbases are e deleters" "(u):u"
        .#. ~[ :* :Con :VlessCon] _ [ r | g ] [ Bndry: - %(t%): - %(g%/t%): ]+ :Vow ; ! "vowel postbases are semi-final e deleters" "(u):u"   !maybe ~[:Con :VlessCon] for amlleret ? 
        [[:Vow :Con]|[:Con :VoiceCon]] _ [ r | g ] Bndry:* %%:%> Bndry:* %(e%):e ; ! "Rule (e):e"
        _ (Con:0) Bndry:* %–: %–: l:0 ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
        t: _ [Bndry:-AtSign:]* AtSign: ; ! te@

"rr:r = rte@(u)"
rr:r <=> _ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ t:s (ʼ) e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"s:0 = te~s/c | (t)s/c"
s:0 <=> t:c (ʼ) e:0 Bndry:* _ ; ! te~s/c
        %(t%):c Bndry:* _ ; ! (t)s/c

"t:0 = Cte@¹n/CCn̄ | Cte@²mngv/CCm̄n͞gvv | Cte@³(u)/Cu"
t:0 <=> Con _ e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@¹: ; ! Cte@¹n/CCn̄
        Con _ e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@²: ; ! Cte@²mngv/CCm̄n͞gvv
        VlessFric:VoiceFric _ e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! Cte@³(u)/Cu
        _ (ʼ) e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@⁵: ;
        _ (ʼ) e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@ˡ: ;

"t:c = tV--li/ci | te@y/c | te~s/c" 
t:c <=> _ Vow:0 (Con:0) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* %–: %–: l:0 i ; ! te--li/ci
        _ (ʼ) e:0 [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* i ; ! te~i/ci
        _ (ʼ) e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* %@ʸ: [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* y: ; ! te@y/c
        _ (ʼ) e:0 [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* s: ; ! te~s/c

"t:l = Vte@²/l | te*@³(u)/l | te°@⁴gkng/l"
t:l <=> Vow _ (ʼ) e:0 %°: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@²: ; ! Vte°@²mngv/l
        Vow _ (ʼ) e:0 %°: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! Vte°@³(u)/l
        _ (ʼ) e:0 %°: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! te°@⁴gkng/l

"t:n = WordFinalVte"
t:n <=> Vow _ e: [ .#. | %= ] ; ! Word final Vte

"t:q = te@ˁ/q"
t:q <=> _ (ʼ) e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@ˁ: ; ! te@ˁ/q

"t:s = Vte@²/s | Vtʼe@³(u)/sʼu | Cte@⁴gkng/s"
t:s <=> Vow _ (ʼ) e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: ; ! Vte@²mngv/s
        Vow _ ʼ e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! Vtʼe@³(u)/sʼu
        [Vow|VlessFric:VoiceFric|Nasal|Stop] _ (ʼ) e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"t:y = Vte@³(u)/Vy"
t:y <=> 
!        Vow _ (ʼ) e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: ; ! Vte@²mngv/y  (for HBC)
        [Vow|Nasal|Stop] _ e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! Vte@³(u)/Vy    TODO: Add t'e/y' also for HBC
!        [Vow|VlessFric:VoiceFric|Nasal|Stop] _ (ʼ) e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/y for HBC  

"(t):t = CFinalBase"
%(t%):t <=> :Con Bndry:* _ ; ! CFinalBase
    except
        :Con Bndry:* _ Bndry:* [s:0|y:0] ; ! (t)[sy]/c

"(t):c = (t)s/c"
%(t%):c <=> :Con Bndry:* _ Bndry:* [s:0|y:0] ; ! (t)[sy]/c
